Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4211.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 83. (1) The department shall provide all of the following
to a prisoner who is discharged from custody prior to his or her
before the prisoner's maximum discharge date without being granted
parole because his or her that prisoner's conviction or sentence
has been reversed, vacated, or overturned, or who is discharged
from custody immediately after being resentenced by a court for a
qualifying event:
(a) Reentry services, excluding reentry housing, consistent
with the services received by parolees in this state for a period
LEP H00409'25 (H-3) cdywsa


not to exceed 2 years following the date of his or her the
prisoner's discharge.
(b) Reentry housing, consistent with the transitional housing
provided to parolees in this state for a period not to exceed 1
year following the date of his or her the prisoner's discharge.
(c) Vital documents, including, but not limited to, the
prisoner's birth certificate and any official state personal
identification card.
(2) The department shall assign staff to ensure that a
prisoner eligible for the services and documents described in
subsection (1) is provided with those services and documents in a
timely manner.
(3) A prisoner who received the reentry services described in
subsection (1) and whose conviction is subsequently reinstated or
who is resentenced and returned to the custody of the department
for the same conviction that was previously reversed, vacated, or
overturned entitling him or her the prisoner to the services
described in subsection (1) shall repay the department for all
reentry services he or she that prisoner received under subsection
(1). The department shall determine the amount owed by a prisoner
under this subsection. shall be determined by the department.
(4) As used in this section, "qualifying event" means the
resentencing required by Miller v Alabama, 567 US 460 (2012),
Montgomery v Louisiana, 577 US 190 (2016), People v Parks, 510 Mich
225 (2022), People v Stovall, 510 Mich 301 (2022), People v
Czarnecki, ___Mich___ (2025) (Docket No. 166654), or People v
Taylor, ___Mich___ (2025) (Docket No. 166428).
Final Page
LEP H00409'25 (H-3) cdywsa